Florida, session 2026, HB273.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (h) of subsection (1) of section
215.971, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
215.971 Agreements funded with federal or state
assistance.—
(1) An agency agreement that provides state financial
assistance to a recipient or subrecipient, as those terms are
defined in s. 215.97, or that provides federal financial
assistance to a subrecipient, as defined by applicable United
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb273 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 273, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
States Office of Management and Budget circulars, must include
all of the following:
(h) If the agency agreement provides federal or state
financial assistance to a county or municipality that is a rural
community or rural area of opportunity as those terms are
defined in s. 288.0656(2) or a special district located entirely
within such county or municipality or an independent special
district that provides water and wastewater services within a
rural area of opportunity as defined in s. 288.0656(2), a
provision allowing the agency to provide for the payment of
invoices to such the county, municipality, or special district
rural area of opportunity as that term is defined in s.
288.0656(2), for verified and eligible performance that has been
completed in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth
in the agreement. The provision is not intended to require
reimbursement to such county, municipality, or special district
for invoices paid, but to allow the agency to provide for the
payment of invoices due. The agency shall expedite payment
requests in order to facilitate the timely payment of invoices
received by such county, municipality, or special district. This
provision is included to alleviate the financial hardships that
such certain rural counties, and municipalities, or special
districts encounter when administering agreements, and must be
exercised by the agency if when a county, or municipality, or
special district located entirely within such county or
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb273 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 273, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
municipality or an independent special district that provides
water and wastewater services within a rural area of
opportunity, as defined in s. 288.0656(2), demonstrates
financial hardship, to the extent that federal or state law,
rule, or other regulation allows such payments. This paragraph
may not be construed to alter or limit any other provisions of
federal or state law, rule, or other regulation.
Section 2. Paragraph (e) of subsection (2) of section
288.0656, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
288.0656 Rural Economic Development Initiative.—
(2) As used in this section, the term:
(e) "Rural community" means:
1. A county with a population of 75,000 or fewer.
2. A county with a population of 125,000 or fewer which is
contiguous to a county with a population of 75,000 or fewer.
3. A municipality or special district within a county
described in subparagraph 1. or subparagraph 2.
4. An unincorporated federal enterprise community or an
incorporated rural city with a population of 25,000 or fewer and
an employment base focused on traditional agricultural or
resource-based industries, located in a county not defined as
rural, which has at least three or more of the economic distress
factors identified in paragraph (c) and verified by the
department.
5. An independent special district that provides water and
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb273 -02-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
CS/HB 273, Engrossed 1 2026 Legislature
wastewater services within a rural area of opportunity.

For purposes of this paragraph, population shall be determined
in accordance with the most recent official estimate pursuant to
s. 186.901.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb273 -02-er